en: Rice bran oils
es: Aceites de arroz
fr: Huiles de riz
hr: Ulja rižinih mekinja
it: Olio di riso
ja: こめ油, 米油, 米糠油
lt: Ryžių sėlenų aliejai
nl: Rijstoliën, Rijstvliesoliën
zh: 米糠油

en: Sesame oils
da: Sesamolier
de: Sesamöle
es: Aceites de sésamo
fi: seesamiöljyt
fr: Huiles de sésame
hr: Sezamova ulja
it: Olio di sesamo, olio di semi di sesamo
ja: ごま油, ゴマ油, 胡麻油
lt: Sezamų aliejai
nl: Sesamoliën
pt: Óleos de sésamo
sv: Sesamoljor, Sesamolja
zh: 芝麻油

en: Wheat germ oils
es: Aceites de germen de trigo
fr: Huiles de germe de blé, Huile de germe de blé
hr: Ulja pšeničnih klica
it: Olio di germe di grano
lt: Kviečių gemalų aliejai
nl: Tarwekiemoliën
zh: 小麦胚芽油

en: Cottonseed oils, Cottonseed oil
bg: Памучно масло
es: Aceites de semillas de algodón
fr: Huiles de coton, Huile de coton
hr: Ulja sjemenki pamuka
it: Olio di cotone, olio di semi di cotone
ja: 綿実油
lt: Medvilnės sėmenų aliejus
nl: Katoenzaadoliën
sv: Bomullsfröoljor, Bomullsfröolja
zh: 棉籽油

en: Fruit and fruit seed oils
da: Frugt- og frugtfrøolier
de: Frucht- und Fruchtsamenöle, Öle aus Früchten oder Fruchtsamen
es: Aceites de frutas y semillas de frutas
fi: Hedelmä- ja hedelmänsiemenöljyt
fr: Huiles de fruits et graines de fruits
hr: Voće i ulja od sjemenki voća
it: Olio di frutta e di semi di frutta
lt: Vaisių ir jų sėklų aliejai
nl: Oliën van vruchten en vruchtzaden
sv: Oljor från frukter och fruktfrön
zh: 水果和水果籽油

en: Avocado oils
bg: Авокадово масло
da: Avocadoolier
de: Avocadoöle
es: Aceites de aguacate
fi: Avokadoöljyt
fr: Huiles d'avocat, Huile d'avocat
hr: Ulja avokada
it: Olio di avocado
ja: アボカドオイル
lt: Avokado aliejai
nb: Avokadooljer
nl: Avocado-oliën, Avocado-olie
sv: Avokadooljor
zh: 鳄梨油

en: Coconut oils
de: Kokosöle, Kokosnussöle, Kokosöl, Kokosnussöl, Kokosfette, Kokosfett
es: Aceites de coco
fi: kookosöljyt
fr: Huiles de coco, Huiles de noix de coco
hr: kokosova ulja, kokosovo ulje
it: Olio di cocco
ja: ヤシ油, ココナッツオイル
lt: Kokosų aliejus
nl: Kokosoliën
pl: Oleje kokosowe, olej kokosowy
pt: Óleos de coco
ru: Кокосовое масло
sv: Kokosnötsoljor, Kokosnötsolja
tr: Hindistan cevizi yağı, Hindistancevizi yağı
zh: 椰子油

en: Virgin coconut oils, Virgin coco oils
de: Native Kokosöle
fi: Neitsytkookosöljyt
fr: Huiles vierges de coco, huiles de coco vierges
hr: Djevičanska kokosova ulja
it: Olio di cocco vergine
lt: Gryni kokosų aliejai
nl: Virgin kokosoliën
zh: 维珍椰子油

en: Refined coco oils
es: Aceite de coco refinado
fi: Jalostetut kookosöljyt
fr: Huiles de coco raffinées
hr: Rafinirana kokosova ulja
it: Olio di noce di cocco raffinato
lt: Rafinuoti kokosų aliejai

en: Coprah oils
fr: Huiles de coprah

en: Grape seed oils, Grapeseed oils, Grape oils
de: Traubenkernöle
es: Aceites de pepitas de uva, Aceites de semillas de uva
fi: viinirypälesiemenöljyt
fr: Huiles de pépins de raisins
hr: Ulja sjemenki grožđa
it: Olio di vinaccioli, Olio di semi d'uva
ja: グレープシードオイル
lt: Vynuogių kauliukų aliejai
nl: Druivenpitoliën

en: Watermelon seed oils
es: Aceites de semillas sandía, Aceites de sandía
fr: Huiles de melon d’eau
hr: Ulja sjemenki lubenice
it: Oli di semi di angurie
lt: Arbūzų sėklų aliejai
nl: Watermeloenzaadoliën
zh: 西瓜籽油

en: Hemp oils, Hempseed oils
da: Hampolier, Hampfrøolier
de: Hanföle
es: Aceites de cáñamo
fi: Hamppuöljyt, Hampunsiemenöljyt
fr: Huiles de chanvre
hr: Ulja konoplje
it: Olio di canapa, olio di semi di canapa
lt: Kanapių aliejai, kanapių sėklų aliejai
nl: Hennepoliën
sv: Hampfröoljor, Hampfröolja

en: Legume oils
de: Hülsenfruchtöle
es: Aceites de leguminosas
fr: Huiles de légumineuses
hr: Ulja mahunarki
it: Olio di legumi
lt: Ankštinių augalų aliejai
nl: Peulvruchtoliën
zh: 豆类油

en: Peanut oils
da: Jordnøddeolier, Jordnødolier, Peanutolier
de: Erdnussöle
es: Aceites de cacahuete, Aceites de maní
fi: Maapähkinäöljyt
fr: Huiles d'arachide
hr: Ulja od kikirikija
it: Olio di arachide, Olio di semi di arachide
ja: ピーナッツオイル
lt: Žemės riešutų aliejai
nl: Pindaoliën, Aardnotenoliën, Arachidëneoliën
sv: Jordnötsoljor, Jordnötsolja
tr: Yer fıstığı yağı, Yerfısığı yağı
zh: 花生油

en: Soybean oils, Soy oil
bg: Соево олио
da: Sojaolier
de: Sojaöle, Sojabohnenöle
es: Aceites de soja
fr: Huile de soja
hr: Sojina ulja
it: Olio di soia, Olio di semi di soia
ja: 大豆油
lt: Sojų pupelių aliejai
nl: Sojaoliën
sv: Sojaoljor, sojaolja
zh: 大豆油

en: Mixed vegetable oils, blended vegetable oils, combined vegetable oils, vegetable oil mixes
da: Blandinger af vegetabilske olier
es: Mezclas de aceites vegetales
fi: Kasvisöljysekoitukset
fr: Mélanges d'huiles, huiles combinées, Huile combinée, mélange d'huiles
hr: Miješana biljna ulja
it: Oli vegetali misti
lt: Maišyti augaliniai aliejai
nl: Oliemelanges
zh: 混合植物油

en: Mix of olive oil and seeds oil, Combined oil
fr: Mélange d'huile d'olive et de graines

en: Mustard oils
de: Senföle
es: Aceites de mostaza
fr: Huiles de moutarde
hr: Ulja gorušice
it: Olio di semi di senape
ja: マスタードオイル
lt: Garstyčių aliejai
nl: Mosterdoliën
sv: Senapsoljor, Senapsolja
tr: Hardal yağı
zh: 芥末油

en: Nut oils
da: Nøddeolier
de: Nussöle
es: Aceites de frutos de cáscara, Aceites de frutos secos
fi: pähkinäöljyt
fr: Huiles de fruits à coques
hr: Orašastih ulja
it: Olio di semi
ja: ナッツオイル
lt: Riešutų aliejai
nl: Notenoliën
pl: Oleje z orzechów
zh: 坚果油